Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5633.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 5-19.1 of the General Laws entitled "Pharmacies" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
5-19.1-37. Continuation of therapy prescription refill.
(a) In the event a pharmacist receives a request for a prescription refill, and the pharmacist
is unable to readily obtain refill authorization from the prescriber, or the patient does not have a
prescriber, the pharmacist may dispense a one-time refill for continuation of therapy, up to, but no
more than one hundred (100) days of the prescribed medication provided that:
(1) The prescription is not for a drug in Schedule II-V appearing in chapter 28 of title 21
("uniform controlled substances act");
(2) The medication is essential to the maintenance of life or to the continuation of therapy
of a chronic condition;
(3) In the pharmacist's professional judgment, the interruption of therapy might reasonably
produce undesirable health consequences or may cause physical or mental discomfort; and
(4) The dispensing pharmacist notifies the prescriber of the dispensing within seven (7)
business days. If no current prescriber exists, the pharmacist shall document such in their internal
record keeping system.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC001849
========
LC001849 - Page 2 of 3